New Jersey, session 221, S1604.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 13 of P.L.1979, c.8 (C.52:11-66) is amended to read as follows: 13. It shall be the duty of the Director of Public Information to: a.   Provide, as requested, information and other related services for the Legislature, its officers, committees, commissions and individual members. b.   Operate a nonpartisan public information service on legislative affairs and a Bill Room for use by the Legislature, its staff, other State and public offices and, when practicable, for the general public. c.   Provide, when requested by the Legislature and directed by the commission, for the scheduling, recording and transcription of the proceedings of legislative committee and commission meetings and hearings. d.   Provide for the maintenance of a library and library services with special emphasis on legislative reference materials for the use of the Legislature and its staff. e.   Plan, develop and coordinate programs regarding the interaction of the Legislature with the public, including public communication, orientation and tours and educational programs. f.   Provide general standards for the Office of Legislative Services in providing information to the public. g.   Maintain a public commercial subscription service for bills, laws and other information. h.   Provide such other services as the commission or Executive Director may direct or as shall be provided by law or House rule. i.   Provide information to the Legislature and to the public about the State House Flag Program, established pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). (cf: P.L.1985, c.162, s.10) 2.    (New Section) There is established in the State Capitol Joint Management Commission the State House Flag Program.  At the request of a member of the Legislature, a commemorative New Jersey State flag shall be flown over the New Jersey State House.  Flags shall be flown based on the procedures followed by the State Capitol Joint Management Commissions Building Management office.  For each flag flown at the request of a member of the Legislature, the Building Management office shall produce a certificate.  The certificate shall state the date on which the flag was flown and the name of the individual, group, or organization for which the flag was flown.  The Building Management office shall mail the flag and certificate to the individual, group, or organization. 3.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Capitol Joint Management Commission such an amount as shall be necessary for purposes of the implementation of this act. 4. This act shall take effect 180 days following the date of enactment.